Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2529
Referendum petition; failure of municipal governing body to act; effect; special election.

Whenever a referendum petition bearing signatures equal in number to at least fifteen percent of the qualified electors of a municipal subdivision has been filed with the city clerk and verified pursuant to section 18-2518, it shall be the duty of the municipal subdivision's governing body to reconsider the measure or portion of such measure which is the object of the referendum. If the governing body fails to repeal or amend the measure or portion thereof in the manner proposed by the referendum, including an override of any veto, if necessary, within thirty days from the date the governing body receives notification pursuant to section 18-2518, the city clerk shall cause the measure to be submitted to a vote of the people at the next regularly scheduled primary or general election held within the municipal subdivision. If the governing body desires to submit the measure to a vote of the people at a special election prior to the next regularly scheduled primary or general election held within the municipal subdivision, the governing body shall, by resolution, direct the clerk to cause the measure to be submitted at a special election. Such resolution shall not be subject to referendum or limited referendum.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 29;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 19.